src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1ateqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+TUQAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCtoqaq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateqZ ;

		
LEXICON Z1ateq_tptZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>eeraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>ikkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>ikkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>ikkormioq@C.Num@ K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>ikulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>innguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>ipalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCssuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>ersuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>ersuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCssuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>aa	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>aanerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_tptZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateq_atZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCa	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCanerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_atZ ;
			
LEXICON Z1ateq_taqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_taqZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateq_saqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ; !liv 170329
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_saqZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateq_seqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_seqZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateq_leqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_leqZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateq_gaqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_gaqZ ;

LEXICON Z1ateq_ngaqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_ngaqZ ;
			
LEXICON Z1ateq_goqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_goqZ ;
			
LEXICON Z1ateq_qoqZmorf
+Sem/Hum+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1Prop+qaZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkormiu@C.Num@	tp ;
+Sem/Hum+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ@C.Num@+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkormioq@C.Num@	K ;
+Sem/Hum+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkulunnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+SUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrsuannguaq	Z1nnguaq_ateqZ ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+U+Der/nv+NIRAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCunerar	TV ;
			Z1ateq_qoqZ ;
			
