src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
Aalik+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr:Aalik Z1ateqZmorf ;
Abba Z1ateqZmorf ;
Abihu Z1ateqZmorf ;
Abiram Z1ateqZmorf ;
Agrippa Z1ateqZmorf ;
Akvila Z1ateqZmorf ;
Alataq+Sem/LastName+Dial/Vgr+Dial/Ngr:Alataq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Alcoa Z1ateqZmorf ;
Ali	Z1ateqZmorf ;
Alsø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Amaarnaaq   Z1ateqZmorf ;
Amaju Z1ateqZmorf ;
Amattanneq+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr:Amattanneq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Amnon Z1ateqZmorf ;
Anersaaq Z1ateqZmorf;
Angora Z1ateqZmorf ;
Anguupisen+Sem/LastName+Dial/Vgr:Anguupisen Z1ateqZmorf ;
Angûpesen+Sem/LastName+Dial/Vgr:Angûpesen Z1ateqZmorf ;
Aqipi+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr:Aqipi Z1ateqZmorf ;
Ashera Z1ateqZmorf ;
Astbury Z1ateqZmorf ;
Ataataq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Attakkaat+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr@U.Num.Sg@:Attakkaat@U.Num.Sg@ Z1ateqZmorf ;
Avike+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Avike Z1ateqZmorf ;
Azarja Z1ateqZmorf ;
Baagø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Baltu Z1ateqZmorf ;
Barabba Z1ateqZmorf ;
Barnaba Z1ateqZmorf ;
Barsabba Z1ateqZmorf ;
Beatty Z1ateqZmorf ;
Benaja Z1ateqZmorf ;
Billesø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Botha Z1ateqZmorf ;
Brugseni	Z1ateqZmorf ;
Bureau Z1ateqZmorf ;
Carina Z1ateqZmorf ;
Chilly Z1ateqZmorf ;
Chomsky Z1ateqZmorf ;
City Z1ateqZmorf ;
Corinda Z1ateqZmorf ;
Crosby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Dagø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Danida Z1ateqZmorf ;
Danø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Debussy Z1ateqZmorf ;
Dewey Z1ateqZmorf ;
Dibir Z1ateqZmorf ;
Disney Z1ateqZmorf ;
Drusilla Z1ateqZmorf ;
Eiby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Eipe+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Eipe Z1ateqZmorf ;
Elihu Z1ateqZmorf ;
Emeka Z1ateqZmorf ;
Erngsen+Sem/LastName+Dial/Sgr:Erngsen Z1ateqZmorf ;
Ernikaq Z1ateqZmorf;
Euodia Z1ateqZmorf ;
Faursby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Filatelia Z1ateqZmorf ;
Fladså Z1ateqZmorf ;
Fonda Z1ateqZmorf ;
Fortuna Z1ateqZmorf ;
Friderica Z1ateqZmorf ;
Gallio Z1ateqZmorf ;
Gazeta Z1ateqZmorf ;
Goscinny Z1ateqZmorf ;
Grubba Z1ateqZmorf ;
Gurreby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Gösta Z1ateqZmorf ;
Halaby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Hanun Z1ateqZmorf ;
Healey Z1ateqZmorf ;
Hemingway Z1ateqZmorf ;
Hilary Z1ateqZmorf ;
Hillingsø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Hoba Z1ateqZmorf ;
Hosea Z1ateqZmorf ;
Huseby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Hygæa Z1ateqZmorf ;
Iggu Z1ateqZmorf ;
Illernartoq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Imîna+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Imîna Z1ateqZmorf ;
Inuiaat% Kulturiannut% Oqaluttuarisaanerannullu% Immikkoortortaq	Z1ateqZmorf ;
Ivik+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Ivik Z1ateqZmorf ;
Jacoby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Jazeera Z1ateqZmorf ;
Jehova Z1ateqZmorf ;
Jensby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Jerichau Z1ateqZmorf ;
Joanna Z1ateqZmorf ;
Jojada Z1ateqZmorf ;
Jutta Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kafka Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kana Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kanawa Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kanukoka Z1ateqZmorf ;
Karlsbø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Keba Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kilroy Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kirkeby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Klinkby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Klintø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Klose:Klose%PROP Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kongsø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Konstanza Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kuhlau Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kuisisoq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kukku+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr+Dial/Vgr:Kukku Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kuza Z1ateqZmorf ;
Kúko+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr+Dial/Vgr:Kúko Z1ateqZmorf ; 
Lerby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Loyla Z1ateqZmorf ;
Lyngsø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Lysias Z1ateqZmorf ;
Maradona Z1ateqZmorf ;
Mattata Z1ateqZmorf ;
McCarrick Z1ateqZmorf ;
Medusa Z1ateqZmorf ;
Mequ+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Mequ Z1ateqZmorf ;
Metusalem Z1ateqZmorf ;
Mira Z1ateqZmorf ;
Mølby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Netanyahu Z1ateqZmorf ;
Nordby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Nørby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Obama Z1ateqZmorf ;
Ofra Z1ateqZmorf ;
Orasilla Z1ateqZmorf ; 
Papuga Z1ateqZmorf ;
Pekaja Z1ateqZmorf ;
Pilersuisoq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Potifera Z1ateqZmorf ;
Raaschou Z1ateqZmorf ;
Renabeam Z1ateqZmorf ;
Rie:Rie%PROP Z1ateqZmorf ;
Rode:Rode%PROP Z1ateqZmorf ;
Rousseau Z1ateqZmorf ;
Saint-Exupéry Z1ateqZmorf ;
Schou Z1ateqZmorf ;
Serhius Z1ateqZmorf ;
Shebna Z1ateqZmorf ;
Shim Z1ateqZmorf ;
Sidkija Z1ateqZmorf ;
Sisera Z1ateqZmorf ;
Sofar Z1ateqZmorf ;
Stensiö Z1ateqZmorf ;
Suersaq+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Suersaq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Såby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Taorana+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Taorana Z1ateqZmorf ;
Tarĸisimat+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr@U.Num.Sg@:Tarĸisimat@U.Num.Sg@ Z1ateqZmorf ;
Tinnaaq+Sem/LastName+Dial/Ngr:Tinnaaq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Togeby Z1ateqZmorf ;
Tryfæna Z1ateqZmorf ;
Tûkula+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr:Tûkula Z1ateqZmorf ; 
Uitsalikitseĸ+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr:Uitsalikitseĸ Z1ateqZmorf ; 
Umeerinneq+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr:Umeerinneq Z1ateqZmorf ;
Uzza Z1ateqZmorf ;
Viderø Z1ateqZmorf ;
Westminster% Abbey Z1ateqZmorf ;
Zerubbabel Z1ateqZmorf ;
de% Fontenay Z1ateqZmorf ;
Âlik+Sem/LastName+Dial/Egr:Âlik Z1ateqZmorf ;
Center% Air% Pilot% Academy	Z1ateqZmorf ;
